Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2511SS (2) 91 ll/ns S.F. 405 Section 1. Section 123.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 8. To establish a process to allow a person 3 to be voluntarily excluded from the purchase of alcoholic 4 beverages. The process must provide that an initial request 5 by a person to be voluntarily excluded shall be for a period 6 of five years or life and any subsequent request following 7 any five-year period shall be for a period of five years or 8 life. The process established must require that retail alcohol 9 licensees be provided electronic access to names and social 10 security numbers of persons voluntarily excluded through a 11 secured, interactive internet site maintained by the department 12 of revenue, and information regarding persons voluntarily 13 excluded shall be disseminated to all retail alcohol licensees 14 under this chapter. The names, social security numbers, and 15 information regarding persons voluntarily excluded shall be 16 kept confidential unless otherwise ordered by a court or by 17 another person duly authorized to release such information. 18 The process established must also require that a person 19 requesting to be voluntarily excluded be provided information 20 compiled by the department of health and human services on the 21 comprehensive substance use disorder program under chapter 125 22 for substance use disorder treatment and prevention programs. 23 The state and any retail alcohol licensee under this chapter 24 shall not be liable to any person for any claim which may 25 arise from this process. The department of revenue shall not 26 initiate any administrative action against or impose penalties 27 on a licensee who voluntarily reports to the department 28 of revenue an alcoholic beverage sale to a person who has 29 voluntarily excluded themselves from purchasing alcoholic 30 beverages. 31